Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act
14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-343.
Disposition of known claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved corporation shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice must:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation must receive the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved corporation is barred:

If a claimant who was given written notice under subsection (2) of this section does not deliver the claim to the dissolved corporation by the deadline;

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within ninety (90) days from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 122, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.01 through 79-4-14.09

Dissolution effective upon the effective date of the articles of dissolution, see § 79-11-339.

Barring of claim against dissolved corporation where claimant did not receive written notice under this section, see § 79-11-345.

Applicability of this section to administrative dissolution by Secretary of State, see § 79-11-349.

Applicability of this section to judicial dissolution of a corporation, see § 79-11-361.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-345.
Notice of dissolution and request for presentation of claims against corporation; statute of limitations; enforcement of claims.

A dissolved corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the corporation present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice must:

Be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office is or was located, or in Hinds County if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the corporation will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within two (2) years after publication of this notice.

If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within two (2) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under Section 79-11-343;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this section:

Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against any person, other than a creditor of the corporation, to whom the corporation distributed its property to the extent of the distributee’s pro rata share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to such person in liquidation, whichever is less, but the distributee’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the distributee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 123; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 62, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (2)(a), substituted “principal office is or was located, or in Hinds County if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” for “(or, if none in this state, its registered office) is or was last located” at the end.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.01 through 79-4-14.09

Dissolution effective upon effective date of articles of dissolution, see § 79-11-339.

Applicability of this section to administrative dissolution by Secretary of State, see § 79-11-349.

Applicability of this section to judicial dissolution of a corporation, see § 79-11-361.

14 C.J.S., Charities §§ 76, 77.

§79-11-347.
Administrative dissolution by Secretary of State, grounds for.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under Section 79-11-349 to administratively dissolve a corporation if:

The corporation does not pay within sixty (60) days after they are due any taxes or penalties imposed by Section 79-11-101 et seq. or other law;

The corporation does not deliver a requested status report to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days after it is due;

The corporation is without a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

The corporation does not notify the Secretary of State within one hundred twenty (120) days that its registered agent has been changed or that its registered agent has resigned;

The corporation’s period of duration, if any, stated in its articles of incorporation expires;

The corporation fails to report within the time period specified in Section 79-11-405 the suspension or revocation of its tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; or

An incorporator, director, officer or agent of the corporation signed a document he knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 124; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 15; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 63, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

In 2009, a typographical error in paragraph (a) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added (f) and made related changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “or registered office” following “registered agent” in (c) and the first time it appears in (d); deleted “or that its registered office has been discontinued” from the end of (d); added (g); and made minor stylistic changes.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Administrative dissolution under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.20 through 79-4-14.23.

Application by corporation for reinstatement after administrative dissolution, see § 79-11-351.

Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, see 26 USCS § 501(c)(3).

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2397.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 511-525.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 107.

§79-11-349.
Administrative dissolution, procedures.

Upon determining that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-11-347 for dissolving a corporation, the Secretary of State shall notify the corporation in the form of a record of that determination.

If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within at least sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected, the Secretary of State may administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation.

A corporation administratively dissolved continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any activities except those necessary to wind up and liquidate its affairs under Section 79-11-341 and notify its claimants under Sections 79-11-343 and 79-11-345.

The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 125; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 16; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 64, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, in (1), substituted “notify the corporation in form of a record of that determination” for “serve the corporation with written notice of that determination under Section 79-11-169” at the end of the first sentence, and added the last sentence; in (2), deleted “under Section 79-11-169” following “service of the notice is perfected” in the first sentence and rewrote the last sentence.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “For purpose of this section, notice may be made by publication by newspaper of general circulation in the area of the corporation’s last-known location” from the end of (1); deleted “if the corporation has filed a valid address or registered agent with the Secretary of State within the previous calendar year” from the end of (2).

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Administrative dissolution under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.20 through 79-4-14.23.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Application by corporation for reinstatement after administrative dissolution, see § 79-11-351.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 511-525.

§79-11-351.
Reinstatement after administrative dissolution.

A corporation administratively dissolved under Section 79-11-349 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement at any time after the effective date of dissolution. The application must:

Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated;

State that the corporation’s name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-11-157; and

Contain a certificate from the Department of Revenue reciting that all taxes owed by the corporation have been paid.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (1) of this section and that the information is correct, the Secretary of State shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement reciting that determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation.

When reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the corporation shall resume carrying on its activities as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 126; Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 15; Laws, 2009, ch. 527, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 65, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment substituted “at any time” for “within five (5) years” in the first sentence of the introductory language of (1).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “Department of Revenue” for “State Tax Commission” in (1)(d); and deleted “under Section 79-11-169” at the end of (2).

Department of Revenue generally, see §§ 27-3-1 et seq.

Administrative dissolution under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.20 through 79-4-14.23.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Reinstatement of repealed, forfeited, expired, or suspended corporate charter as validating interim acts of corporation.
42 A.L.R.4th 392.

§79-11-353.
Denial of application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution; appeals.

The Secretary of State, upon denying a corporation’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, shall serve the corporation with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is or was located, or in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, within ninety (90) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State’s certificate of dissolution, the corporation’s application for reinstatement and the Secretary of State’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 127; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 66, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “under Section 79-11-169” preceding “with a written notice that explains” near the end of (1); and substituted “principal office is or was located, or in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” for “principal office for if none in the state, its registered office) is located” in (2).

Administrative dissolution under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.20 through 79-4-14.23.

Chancery court’s power to dissolve nonprofit corporation and to hear appeal from Secretary of State’s denial of reinstatement following administrative dissolution, see §§ 79-11-353 and 79-11-355.

§79-11-355.
Dissolution by court order; parties who may bring action; grounds for court-ordered dissolution.

The chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is or was located, or in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may dissolve a corporation:

In a proceeding by the Attorney General or the Secretary of State if it is established that:

The corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud;

The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law; or

If the corporation is a charitable organization, as defined in Section 79-11-501, that:

1. The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted;

2. The corporation is unable to carry out its purpose(s); or

3. The corporation has violated the laws regulating the solicitation of charitable contributions, Section 79-11-501 et seq.;

In a proceeding by fifty (50) members or members holding five percent (5%) of the voting power, whichever is less, or by a director if it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, and the members, if any, are unable to breach the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted, are acting or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive or fraudulent;

The members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two (2) consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have, or would otherwise have, expired; or

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted;

In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

The creditor’s claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment returned unsatisfied and the corporation is insolvent; or

The corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor’s claim is due and owing and the corporation is insolvent; or

In a proceeding by the corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision.

Prior to dissolving a corporation, the court shall consider whether there are reasonable alternatives to dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 128; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 67, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (1)(a).

The 2012 amendment, rewrote (1), effective January 1, 2013, effective January 1, 2013, substituted ‘principal office is or was located, or in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” for ‘principal office (or if none in the state, its registered office) is located.”

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.30 through 79-4-14.34.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Decree of judicial dissolution, see § 79-11-361.

Relief other than by dissolution in cases of intracorporate deadlock or dissension. 34 A.L.R.4th 13.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2397.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-357.
Court-ordered dissolution, venue; appropriate party defendants; authority of court with respect to.

Venue for a proceeding to dissolve a corporation lies in the county where a corporation’s principal office is or was located, or in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state.

It is not necessary to make directors or members parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located and carry on the activities of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 129; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 68, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (1), effective January 1, 2013, substituted ‘principal office is or was located, or in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” for ‘principal office (or if none in the state, its registered office) is or was located.”

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.30 through 79-4-14.34.

Relief other than by dissolution in cases of intracorporate deadlock or dissension. 34 A.L.R.4th 13.

Place where corporation is doing business for purposes of state venue statute. 42 A.L.R.5th 221.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 511-525.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-359.
Issuance of injunctions; appointment of receivers or custodians; application and distribution of corporation assets or proceeds from sale or other disposition.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation shall have the power to issue injunctions and may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage, the affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation (authorized to transact business in this state) as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver (i) may dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; provided, however, that the receiver’s power to dispose of the assets of the corporation is subject to any trust and other restrictions that would be applicable to the corporation; and (ii) may sue and defend in the receiver’s or custodian’s name as receiver or custodian of the corporation in all courts of this state;

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of its members and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation, its members and creditors.

The assets of the corporation or the proceeds resulting from a sale, conveyance or other disposition thereof shall be applied and distributed as the court may order, after taking into account the following standards:

All costs and expenses of the court proceedings and all liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall, to the extent that unencumbered assets are available therefor, be paid first toward the payment of costs and expenses of the court proceedings, and then toward other liabilities and obligations of the corporation.

All liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall be paid, satisfied and discharged; in case its property and assets are not sufficient to satisfy or discharge all the corporation’s liabilities and obligations, the court shall apply them so far as they will go to the just and equitable payment of the liabilities and obligations.

Assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution or liquidation, shall be returned, transferred or conveyed in accordance with such requirements.

If the corporation to be dissolved is a charitable organization, as defined in Section 79-11-501, the remaining assets shall be transferred to another charitable organization or other charitable organizations, as defined in Section 79-11-501, either domestic or foreign, engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving corporation, or to the federal government, or to a state or local government, for a public purpose. For all other nonprofit corporations, assets received and held by the corporation subject to limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational or similar purposes, but not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance by reason of the dissolution, shall be transferred or conveyed to one or more domestic or foreign corporations, societies or organizations engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving corporation as the court may direct.

Other assets, if any, shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws to the extent that the articles of incorporation or bylaws determine the distributive right of members, or any class or classes of members, or provide for distribution to others.

Any remaining assets may be distributed to such persons, societies, organizations or domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, specified in the plan of distribution adopted as provided in this chapter, or where no plan of distribution has been adopted, as the court may direct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 130; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

The 2009 amendment inserted “shall have the power to issue injunctions and” in the first sentence of (1); and added (5).

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.30 through 79-4-14.34.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-403.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-361.
Decree of judicial dissolution.

If after the hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in Section 79-11-355 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Secretary of State, who shall file it.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation’s affairs in accordance with Section 79-11-341 and the notification of its claimants in accordance with Sections 79-11-343 and 79-11-345.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 131, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-14.30 through 79-4-14.34.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

§79-11-363.
Foreign corporations, authority to transact business; transacting business defined.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

The following activities, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of subsection (1) of this section:

Maintaining, defending or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of the board of directors or members or carrying on other activities concerning internal corporate affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of memberships or securities or maintaining trustees or depositaries with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty (30) days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature;

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

The list of activities in subsection (2) of this section is not exhaustive.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 132, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.01 through 79-4-15.10.

Foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on the effective date of §§ 79-11-101 et seq. is not required to obtain new certificate of authority, see § 79-11-397.

Effect of execution of foreign corporation’s contract which, while executory, was unenforceable because of noncompliance with conditions of doing business in state. 7 A.L.R.2d 256.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 157 et seq.

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, Forms 31, 32.

4 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 483, Doing Business.

State venue provisions for civil actions as violating equal protection clause of Federal Constitution’s Fourteenth Amendment – Supreme Court cases. 119 L. Ed. 2d 665.

§79-11-365.
Foreign corporation transacting business without certificate of authority not to maintain proceeding in any court; stay of proceeding until certificate obtained; penalty for transacting business without certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority may not maintain a proceeding in any court in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority.

The successor to a foreign corporation that transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business may not maintain a proceeding on that cause of action in any court in this state until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains a certificate of authority.

A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation, its successor or assignee until it determines whether the foreign corporation, its successor or assignee requires a certificate of authority. If it so determines, the court may further stay the proceeding until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains the certificate.

A foreign corporation is liable for a civil penalty of Five Dollars ($5.00) for each day, but not to exceed a total of two (2) times the fee required under Section 79-11-109 for securing articles of incorporation for each year, it transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority. The Attorney General may collect all penalties due under this subsection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 133, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.01 through 79-4-15.10.

Foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on the effective date of §§ 79-11-101 et seq. is not required to obtain new certificate of authority, see § 79-11-397.

Construction work by foreign corporation as doing business for purposes of statute requiring foreign corporation to qualify as condition of access to local courts.
90 A.L.R.3d 937.

Application of statute denying access to courts or invalidating contracts where corporation fails to comply with regulatory statute as affected by compliance after commencement of action.
23 A.L.R.5th 744.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 157 et seq., 225, 230 et seq.

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, Forms 31, 32.

State venue provisions for civil actions as violating equal protection clause of Federal Constitution’s Fourteenth Amendment – Supreme Court cases. 119 L. Ed. 2d 665.

§79-11-367.
Foreign corporation, application for certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state by delivering an application to the Secretary of State. The application must set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation or, if its name is unavailable for use in this state, a corporate name that satisfies the requirements of Section 79-11-373;

The name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

The date of incorporation and period of duration;

The street address of its principal office;

The information required under Section 79-35-5(a);

The names and usual business or home addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Whether the foreign corporation has members.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence (or a document of similar import), dated not more than sixty (60) days prior to the date the application is filed in this state, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 134; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 69, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (1)(e), which previously read “The address of its registered office in this state and the name of its registered agent at that office.‘

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.01 through 79-4-15.10.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Applicability of this section to a foreign corporation’s obtaining an amended certificate of authority, see § 79-11-369.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 205 et seq.

State venue provisions for civil actions as violating equal protection clause of Federal Constitution’s Fourteenth Amendment – Supreme Court cases. 119 L. Ed. 2d 665.

§79-11-369.
Foreign corporation, amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state must obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Secretary of State if it changes:

Its corporate name;

The period of its duration;

Any information required by Section 79-35-5(a); or

The state or country or its incorporation.

The requirements of Section 79-11-367 for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 135; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 70, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (1)(d); and make a related stylistic change.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.01 through 79-4-15.10.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Applicability of this section to change of name of foreign corporation authorized to transact business, see § 79-11-373.

§79-11-371.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact business in this state subject, however, to the right of the state to revoke the certificate as provided in Section 79-11-101 et seq.

A foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same rights and enjoys the same privileges as, and except as otherwise provided by Section 79-11-101 et seq. is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic corporation of like character.

Section 79-11-101 et seq. do not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 136, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (1), (2) and (3) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.01 through 79-4-15.10.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 173 et seq..

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, §§ 11 et seq.

§79-11-373.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

If the corporate name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of Section 79-11-157, the foreign corporation to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in this state may use a fictitious name to transact business in this state if its real name is unavailable and it delivers to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the resolution of its board of directors, certified by its secretary, adopting the fictitious name.

Except as authorized by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the corporate name (including a fictitious name) of a foreign corporation must be distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from:

The corporate name of a nonprofit or business corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state;

A corporate name reserved or registered under Section 79-11-159 or 79-11-161 or pursuant to the Mississippi Business Corporation Act;

The fictitious name of another foreign business or nonprofit corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

A foreign corporation may apply to the Secretary of State for authorization to use in this state the name of another corporation (incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state) that is not distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name applied for. The Secretary of State shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

The other corporation consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the applying corporation; or

The applicant delivers to the Secretary of State a certified copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant’s right to use the name applied for in this state.

A foreign corporation may use in this state the name (including the fictitious name) of another domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation that is used in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state and the foreign corporation:

Has merged with the other corporation;

Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state changes its corporate name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of Section 79-11-157, it shall not transact business in this state under the changed name until it adopts a name satisfying the requirements of Section 79-11-157 and obtains an amended certificate of authority under Section 79-11-369.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 137, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Section 79-11-161 referred to in (2)(b), was repealed by
Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 10, effective July 1, 2014.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.01 through 79-4-15.10.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Applicability of this section to application by foreign corporation for certificate of authority to transact business, see § 79-11-367.

Right of benevolent or fraternal society or organization to protection against use of same or similar name, insignia, or ritual by another organization.
76 A.L.R.2d 1396.

Right to protection of corporate name, as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state.
26 A.L.R.3d 994.

Right of charitable or religious association or corporation to protection against use of same or similar name by another.
37 A.L.R.3d 277.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 240,
241,
244.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 150 et seq.

Walker, Common law protection of economic expectancies: “Business Torts” in Mississippi.
50 Miss. L. J. 335, March, 1979.

§79-11-375.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 134, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-11-375. [Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 138; Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1988.]

Former
§ 79-11-375 required a foreign nonprofit corporation to maintain a registered office and registered agent in the state.
For present provisions relating to registered agents, see
§§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-11-377.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 135, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-11-377. [Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 139; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 17, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.]

Former
§ 79-11-377 required a foreign nonprofit corporation to maintain a registered office and registered agent in the state.
For present provisions relating to registered agents, see
§§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-11-379.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 136, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-11-379. [Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 140 eff from and after Jan. 1, 1988.]